California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1635, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2238.

A violation of any federal statute or federal regulation or any of the statutes or regulations of this state regulating dangerous drugs or controlled substances constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1635, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2239.

(a) The use or prescribing for or administering to himself or herself, of any controlled substance; or the use of any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or of alcoholic beverages, to the extent, or in such a manner as to be dangerous or injurious to the licensee, or to any other person or to the public, or to the extent that such use impairs the ability of the licensee to practice medicine safely or more than one misdemeanor or any felony involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances referred to
 in this section, or any combination thereof, constitutes unprofessional conduct. The record of the conviction is conclusive evidence of such unprofessional conduct.

(b) A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The Division of Medical Quality may order discipline of the licensee in accordance with Section 2227 or the Division of Licensing may order the denial of the license when the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or
 indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 878, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2240.

(a) A physician and surgeon who performs a medical procedure outside of a general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, that results in the death of any patient on whom that medical treatment was performed by the physician and surgeon, or by a person acting under the physician and surgeon’s orders or supervision, shall report, in writing on a form prescribed by the board, that occurrence to the board within 15 days after the occurrence.

(b) A physician and surgeon who performs a scheduled medical procedure outside of a general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety
 Code, that results in the transfer to a hospital or emergency center for medical treatment for a period exceeding 24 hours, of any patient on whom that medical treatment was performed by the physician and surgeon, or by a person acting under the physician and surgeon’s orders or supervision, shall report, in writing, on a form prescribed by the board that occurrence, within 15 days after the occurrence. The form shall contain all of the following information:

(1) Name of the patient’s physician in the outpatient setting.

(2) Name of the physician with hospital privileges.

(3) Name of the patient and patient identifying information.

(4) Name of the hospital or emergency
 center where the patient was transferred.

(5) Type of outpatient procedures being performed.

(6) Events triggering the transfer.

(7) Duration of the hospital stay.

(8) Final disposition or status, if not released from the hospital, of the patient.

(9) Physician’s practice specialty and ABMS certification, if applicable.

(c) The form described in subdivision (b) shall be constructed in a format to enable the physician and surgeon to transmit the information in paragraphs (5) to (9), inclusive, to the board in a manner that the
 physician and surgeon and the patient are anonymous and their identifying information is not transmitted to the board. The entire form containing information described in paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, shall be placed in the patient’s medical record.

(d) The board shall aggregate the data and publish an annual report on the information collected pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).

(e) On and after January 1, 2002, the data required in subdivision (b) shall be sent to the Department of Health Care Access and Information instead of the board. The Department of Health Care Access and Information may revise the reporting requirements to fit state and national standards, as applicable. The board shall work with the Department of Health Care Access and Information in developing
 the reporting mechanism to satisfy the data collection requirements of this section.

(f) The failure to comply with this section constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 10.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2241.

(a) A physician and surgeon may prescribe, dispense, or administer prescription drugs, including prescription controlled substances, to a person with substance use disorder under the physician and surgeon’s treatment for a purpose other than maintenance on, or detoxification from, prescription drugs or controlled substances.

(b) A physician and surgeon may prescribe, dispense, or administer prescription drugs or prescription controlled substances to a person with substance use disorder for purposes of maintenance on, or detoxification from, prescription drugs or controlled substances only as set forth in subdivision (c) or in Sections 11215, 11217, 11217.5, 11218, 11219, and 11220 of the Health and Safety Code. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize a physician and surgeon to prescribe, dispense, or administer dangerous drugs or controlled substances to a person they know or reasonably believe
 is using or will use the drugs or substances for a nonmedical purpose.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), prescription drugs or controlled substances may also be administered or applied by a physician and surgeon, or by a registered nurse acting under their instruction and supervision, under the following circumstances:

(1) Emergency treatment of a patient whose addiction is complicated by the presence of incurable disease, acute accident, illness, or injury, or the infirmities attendant upon age.

(2) Treatment of
 persons with substance use disorder in state-licensed institutions where the patient is kept under restraint and control, or in city or county jails or state prisons.

(3) Treatment of persons with substance use disorder as provided for by Section 11217.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section and Section 2241.5, “person with substance use disorder”
 means a person whose actions are characterized by craving in combination with one or more of the following:

(A) Impaired control over drug use.

(B) Compulsive use.

(C) Continued use despite harm.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a person whose drug-seeking behavior is primarily due to the inadequate control of pain is not a person with substance use disorder within the meaning of this section or Section 2241.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   (AB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2241.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing shall preclude a physician and surgeon from prescribing the use of a phototherapy device to a patient of any age. For purposes of this section, the term “phototherapy device” shall have the same meaning as in Section 22702.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 664, Sec. 1.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2241.5.

(a) A physician and surgeon may prescribe for, or dispense or administer to, a person under their treatment for a medical condition dangerous drugs or prescription controlled substances for the treatment of pain or a condition causing pain, including, but not limited to, intractable pain.

(b) No physician and surgeon shall be subject to disciplinary action for prescribing, dispensing, or administering dangerous drugs or prescription controlled substances in accordance with this section.

(c) This
 section shall not affect the power of the board to take any action described in Section 2227 against a physician and surgeon who does any of the following:

(1) Violates subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 2234 regarding gross negligence, repeated negligent acts, or incompetence.

(2) Violates Section 2241 regarding treatment of a person with substance use disorder.

(3) Violates Section 2242 or 2525.3 regarding performing an appropriate prior examination and the existence of a medical indication for prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing dangerous drugs or recommending medical cannabis.

(4) Violates Section 2242.1 regarding prescribing on the Internet.

(5) Fails to keep complete and accurate records of purchases and disposals of substances listed in the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code) or controlled substances scheduled in the federal Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 (21 U.S.C. Sec. 801 et seq.), or pursuant to the federal Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970. A physician and surgeon shall keep records of their purchases and disposals of these controlled substances or dangerous drugs, including the date of purchase, the date and
 records of the sale or disposal of the drugs by the physician and surgeon, the name and address of the person receiving the drugs, and the reason for the disposal or the dispensing of the drugs to the person, and shall otherwise comply with all state recordkeeping requirements for controlled substances.

(6) Writes false or fictitious prescriptions for controlled substances listed in the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act or scheduled in the federal Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970.

(7) Prescribes, administers, or dispenses in violation of this chapter, or in violation of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11150) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11210) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) A physician and surgeon shall exercise reasonable care in determining
 whether a particular patient or condition, or the complexity of a patient’s treatment, including, but not limited to, a current or recent pattern of drug abuse, requires consultation with, or referral to, a more qualified specialist.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the governing body of a hospital from taking disciplinary actions against a physician and surgeon pursuant to Sections 809.05, 809.4, and 809.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 21, Sec. 2.   (AB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2241.6.

The Division of Medical Quality shall develop standards before June 1, 2002, to assure the competent review in cases concerning the management, including, but not limited to, the undertreatment, undermedication, and overmedication of a patient’s pain. The division may consult with entities such as the American Pain Society, the American Academy of Pain Medicine, the California Society of Anesthesiologists, the California Chapter of the American College of Emergency Physicians, and any other medical entity specializing in pain control therapies to develop the
 standards utilizing, to the extent they are applicable, current authoritative clinical practice guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 518, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2242.

(a) Prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing dangerous drugs as defined in Section 4022 without an appropriate prior examination and a medical indication, constitutes unprofessional conduct. An appropriate prior examination does not require a synchronous interaction between the patient and the licensee and can be achieved through the use of telehealth, including, but not limited to, a self-screening tool or a questionnaire, provided that the licensee complies with the appropriate standard of care.

(b) No licensee shall be found to have committed unprofessional conduct within the meaning of this section if, at the time the drugs were prescribed, dispensed, or furnished, any of the following applies:

(1) The licensee was a designated physician and surgeon or podiatrist serving in the absence of the patient’s physician and surgeon or podiatrist, as the case may be, and if the drugs were prescribed, dispensed, or furnished only as necessary to maintain the patient until the return of the patient’s practitioner, but in any case no longer than 72 hours.

(2) The licensee transmitted the order for the drugs to a registered nurse or to a licensed vocational nurse in an inpatient facility, and if both of the following conditions exist:

(A) The practitioner had consulted with the registered nurse or licensed vocational nurse who had reviewed the patient’s records.

(B) The practitioner was designated as the practitioner to serve in the absence of the patient’s
 physician and surgeon or podiatrist, as the case may be.

(3) The licensee was a designated practitioner serving in the absence of the patient’s physician and surgeon or podiatrist, as the case may be, and was in possession of or had utilized the patient’s records and ordered the renewal of a medically indicated prescription for an amount not exceeding the original prescription in strength or amount or for more than one refill.

(4) The licensee was acting in accordance with Section 120582 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.   (AB 1264)   Effective October 11, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2242.1.

(a) No person or entity may prescribe, dispense, or furnish, or cause to be prescribed, dispensed, or furnished, dangerous drugs or dangerous devices, as defined in Section 4022, on the Internet for delivery to any person in this state, without an appropriate prior examination and medical indication, except as authorized by Section 2242.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of this section may subject the person or entity that has committed the violation to either a fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per occurrence pursuant to a citation issued by the board or a civil penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per occurrence.

(c) The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce this section and to collect the fines or civil penalties authorized by subdivision (b).

(d) For notifications made on and after January 1, 2002, the Franchise Tax Board, upon notification by the Attorney General or the board of a final judgment in an action brought under this section, shall subtract the amount of the fine or awarded civil penalties from any tax refunds or lottery winnings due to the person who is a defendant in the action using the offset authority under
 Section 12419.5 of the Government Code, as delegated by the Controller, and the processes as established by the Franchise Tax Board for this purpose. That amount shall be forwarded to the board for deposit in the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California.

(e) If the person or entity that is the subject of an action brought pursuant to this section is not a resident of this state, a violation of this section shall, if applicable, be reported to the person’s or entity’s appropriate professional licensing authority.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from commencing a disciplinary action against a physician and surgeon pursuant to Section 2242 or 2525.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 719, Sec. 4.   (SB 643)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2242.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, a physician and surgeon, a nurse practitioner acting within the scope of Section 2837.103 or 2837.104, a registered nurse acting in accordance with Section 2725.2, a certified nurse-midwife acting within the scope of Section 2746.51, a nurse practitioner acting within the scope of Section 2836.1, a physician assistant acting within the scope of Section 3502.1, and a pharmacist acting within the scope of Section 4052.3 may use a self-screening tool that will identify patient risk factors for the use of self-administered hormonal contraceptives by a patient, and, after an appropriate prior examination, prescribe, furnish, or dispense, as applicable, self-administered hormonal contraceptives to the patient. Blood pressure, weight, height, and patient health history may be self-reported using the self-screening tool that
 identifies patient risk factors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 2.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2243.

Upon referral by the National Health Services Corps to the Attorney General of the United States of any physician or surgeon who fails to provide service as a general practitioner or physician and surgeon as required pursuant to the grant agreement entered into between the physician and surgeon and the National Health Services Corps program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 254d), or the federal loan insurance program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 294), the board, upon notification by the Attorney General of the United States, shall review the facts and circumstances of the default
 and take appropriate disciplinary action where the board determines that the licensee has committed unprofessional conduct in violation of Section 2234.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2430 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 708, Sec. 11.7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2244.

A physician and surgeon who collects biological specimens for clinical testing or examination shall secure or ensure that his or her employees, agents, or contractors secure those specimens in a locked container when those specimens are placed in a public location outside of the custodial control of the licensee, or his or her employees, agents, or contractors, pursuant to the requirements of Section 681.

Commencing July 1, 2000, the board may impose a fine against a licensee not to exceed the sum of one thousand dollars
 ($1,000) for a violation of this section.

This section shall not apply when the biological specimens have been received by mail in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 922, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2245.

(a) The Medical Board of California on a quarterly basis shall review the data provided pursuant to Section 14028 of the Welfare and Institutions Code by the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Social Services in order to determine if any potential violations of law or excessive prescribing of psychotropic medications inconsistent with the standard of care exist and, if warranted, shall conduct an
 investigation.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall disseminate the treatment guidelines on an annual basis through its existing communications with Medi-Cal providers, such as the department’s Internet Web site or provider bulletins.

(c) If, after an investigation, the Medical Board of California concludes that there was a violation of law, the board shall take disciplinary action, as appropriate, as authorized by Section 2227.

(d) If, after an investigation, the Medical Board of California concludes that there was excessive prescribing of psychotropic medications inconsistent with the standard of care, the board shall take action, as appropriate, as authorized by Section 2227.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section
 10231.5 of the Government Code, commencing July 1, 2017, the Medical Board of California shall report annually to the Legislature, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of Social Services the results of the analysis of data described in Section 14028 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) On or before January 1, 2022, and in conjunction with the consultation with the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services required by subdivision (a) of Section 14028 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the Medical Board of California shall conduct an internal review of its data review, investigative, and disciplinary activities undertaken pursuant to this section for the purpose of
 determining the efficacy of those activities and shall revise its procedures relating to those activities, if determined to be necessary.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 840, Sec. 2.   (SB 1174)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2246.

Any proposed decision or decision issued under this article that contains any finding of fact that the licensee engaged in any act of sexual exploitation, as described in paragraphs (3) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 729, with a patient shall contain an order of revocation. The revocation shall not be stayed by the administrative law judge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1085, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2247.

(a) A licensee shall meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1031 of the Government Code prior to performing either of the following:

(1) An evaluation of a peace officer applicant’s emotional and mental condition.

(2) An evaluation of a peace officer’s fitness for duty.

(b) This section shall become
 operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 777, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2248.

This section shall be known as, and may be cited as, the Grant H. Kenyon Prostate Cancer Detection Act.

(a) If a physician and surgeon, during a physical examination, examines a patient’s prostate gland, the physician and surgeon shall provide information to the patient about the availability of appropriate diagnostic procedures, including, but not limited to, the
 prostate antigen (PSA) test, if any of the following conditions are present:

(1) The patient is over 50 years of age.

(2) The patient manifests clinical symptomatology.

(3) The patient is at an increased risk of prostate cancer.

(4) The provision of the information to the patient is medically necessary, in the opinion of the physician and surgeon.

(b) Violation of subdivision (a) constitutes unprofessional conduct and is not subject to Section 2314.

(c) This section shall not apply to a physician and surgeon working on a trauma case as defined in Section 1798.160 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   (AB 1621)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2248.5.

(a) A standardized written summary in layman’s language and in a language understood by patients shall be approved by the State Department of Health Services. The department may approve the use of an existing publication from a recognized cancer authority as the written summary. Commencing on January 1, 2003, and every three years thereafter, the department shall review its approval of the use of an existing publication from a recognized cancer authority as the written summary to ensure that the approved written summary comprises timely, new,
 and revised information regarding prostate cancer treatment options as the department determines is necessary. The written summary shall be printed or made available by the Medical Board of California to physicians and surgeons, concerning the advantages, disadvantages, risks, and descriptions, of procedures with regard to medically viable and efficacious alternative methods of treatment of prostate cancer. Physicians and surgeons are urged to make the summary available to patients when appropriate.

(b) The board shall post this summary on its Web site for public use.

(c) If the State Department of Health Services updates this summary, the board shall make the updated summary available to its licensees and update its Web site to contain the updated summary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2249.

(a) A physician and surgeon primarily responsible for providing a patient an annual gynecological examination shall provide that patient during the annual examination in layperson’s language and in a language understood by the patient a standardized summary containing a description of the symptoms and appropriate methods of diagnoses for gynecological cancers. This section does not preclude the use of existing publications or pamphlets developed by nationally recognized cancer organizations or by the State Department of Health Services pursuant
 to Section 138.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A physician and surgeon who violates this section may be cited and assessed an administrative fine. No citation shall be issued and no fine shall be assessed upon the first complaint against a physician and surgeon who violates this section. Upon the second and subsequent complaints against a physician and surgeon who violates this section, a citation may be issued and an administrative fine may be assessed.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all fines collected pursuant to this section shall be credited to the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California to be used by the Office of Women’s Health within the State Department of Health Services for outreach services that provide information to women about gynecological cancers, but shall not be expended until they are appropriated by the Legislature in the
 Budget Act or another statute.

(d) Section 2314 shall not apply to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2250.

The willful failure to comply with the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 14191) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the regulations promulgated thereunder, relating to informed consent for sterilization procedures, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2251.

The prescribing, dispensing, administering, or furnishing of liquid silicone for the purpose of injecting such substance into a human breast or mammary constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2252.

The violation of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 109250) of Part 4 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, or any violation of an injunction or cease and desist order issued under those provisions, relating to the treatment of cancer, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 6.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2253.

(a) Failure to comply with the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code) constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person is subject to Section 2052 if the person performs an abortion, and at the time of so doing, does not have a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended license to practice as a physician and surgeon.

(2) A person shall not be subject to Section 2052 if the person performs an abortion by medication or aspiration techniques in the first trimester of pregnancy, and at
 the time of so doing, has a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended license or certificate obtained in accordance with the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)), the Osteopathic Act (Article 21 (commencing with Section 2450) of Chapter 5), the Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700)) or the Physician Assistant Practice Act (Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500)), that authorizes the person to perform the functions necessary for an abortion by medication or aspiration techniques.

(c) In order to perform an abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), a person shall comply with Section 2725.4 or 3502.4.

(d) The Medical Board of California and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall not
 suspend or revoke the certificate of a physician and surgeon solely for performing an abortion if they performed the abortion in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Sections 141, 480, 490, 2221, 2305, 2234, and 2236, the Medical Board of California and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, as applicable, shall not deny an application for licensure as a physician and surgeon, or suspend, revoke, or otherwise impose discipline upon a physician and surgeon licensed in this state under either of the following circumstances:

(1) The physician and surgeon is
 licensed to practice medicine in another state and was disciplined in that state solely for performing an abortion in that state.

(2) The physician and surgeon is licensed to practice medicine in another state and was convicted in that state for an offense related solely to the performance of an abortion in that state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 565, Sec. 1.   (AB 2626)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2254.

The violation of Section 123440 of the Health and Safety Code, relating to research on aborted products of human conception, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 8.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2255.

The violation of any provision of Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 1400) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, relating to the unlawful referral of patients to extended care facilities, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2256.

Any intentional violation of Sections 5326.2 to 5326.8, inclusive, of the Welfare and Institutions Code, relating to the rights of involuntarily confined inpatients, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2257.

The violation of Section 109275 of the Health and Safety Code, relating to informed consent for the treatment of breast cancer, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 9.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2258.

The violation of Section 1708.5 of the Health and Safety Code, relating to the use of laetrile or amygdalin with respect to cancer therapy, constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.9.)
-------------------------------------------

2259.

(a) A physician and surgeon shall give each patient a copy of the standardized written summary, as developed pursuant to subdivision (e), describing silicone implants used in cosmetic, plastic, reconstructive, or similar surgery, before the physician and surgeon performs the surgery. A physician and surgeon may substitute, in place of the standardized written summary for silicone implants, written information authorized for use by the federal Food and Drug Administration prepared by the manufacturer based upon the physician package insert. The
 furnishing of a copy of the standardized written summary or written information shall constitute compliance with the requirements of this section.

(b) Prior to performance of surgery, the physician and surgeon shall note on the patient’s chart that he or she has given the patient the standardized written summary or written information required by this section.

(c) The failure of a physician and surgeon to comply with this section constitutes unprofessional conduct. The provision of the standardized written summary or written information shall not alter, diminish, or modify existing duties of physicians and surgeons, including duties relating to informed consent. However, no physician and surgeon shall be liable as a distributor of a standardized written summary or written information alleged to contain erroneous or incomplete information.

(d) The facility where the surgery is performed shall not be responsible for enforcement of, or verification of, compliance with the requirements of this section.

(e) If the State Department of Health Services determines that the federal Food and Drug Administration has not authorized written information on silicone implants intended for the layperson, the state department shall develop a standardized written summary to inform the patient of the risks and possible side effects of silicone implants as used in cosmetic, plastic, reconstructive, or similar surgery. In developing these summaries, the state department shall do all of the following:

(1) Use only language that is simple and readily understood by a layperson.

(2) Include a disclaimer that the state
 in no way endorses any procedures, nor does the state claim to provide an exhaustive analysis of all the potential benefits or risks associated with any procedure.

(3) Provide only information approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(f) The State Department of Health Services shall update the written summary described in subdivision (e) as determined necessary by the state department to protect the public health and safety.

(g) The Medical Board of California shall publish the standardized written summaries prepared pursuant to subdivision (e), and shall distribute copies of the summaries, upon request, to physicians and surgeons. The Medical Board of California shall make the summaries available for a fee not exceeding, in the aggregate, the actual costs to the State Department of Health Services and
 the Medical Board of California for developing, updating, publishing, and distributing the summaries. Physicians and surgeons performing surgical procedures described in subdivision (a) shall purchase the summaries from the Medical Board of California for distribution to their patients, as required in this section. Any person or entity may purchase the summaries if he, she, or it desires. The Medical Board of California shall fund the State Department of Health Services for the actual cost of developing and updating the summaries incurred by the State Department of Health Services, through an interagency agreement entered into between the Medical Board of California and the State Department of Health Services for that purpose.

The Medical Board of California and the State Department of Health Services may distribute the written information described in subdivision (a) if a manufacturer of silicone implants provides the board and state department with a sufficient
 number of copies of this information, as determined by the state department.

(h) Section 2314 shall not apply to this section.

(i) For purposes of this section, “silicone implant” means any implant containing silicone, including implants using a silicone gel or silicone shell. This definition includes implants using a saline solution with a silicone shell.

(j) A physician and surgeon shall not be responsible for complying with this section until the written summaries are published pursuant to subdivision (g).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1140, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2259.5.

(a) A physician and surgeon shall give each patient a copy of the standardized written summary, as developed pursuant to subdivision (e), describing collagen injections used in cosmetic, plastic, reconstructive, or similar surgery, before the physician and surgeon performs the surgery. A physician and surgeon may substitute, in place of the standardized written summary for collagen injections, written information authorized for use by the federal Food and Drug Administration prepared by the manufacturer based upon the physician package insert.
 The furnishing of a copy of the standardized written summary or written information shall constitute compliance with the requirements of this section.

(b) Prior to the performance of surgery, the physician and surgeon shall note on the patient’s chart that he or she has given the patient the standardized written summary or written information required by this section.

(c) The failure of a physician and surgeon to comply with this section constitutes unprofessional conduct. The provision of the standardized written summary or written information shall not alter, diminish, or modify existing duties relating to informed consent. However, no physician and surgeon shall be liable as a distributor of a standardized written summary or written information alleged to contain erroneous or incomplete information.

(d) The
 facility where the surgery is performed shall not be responsible for enforcement of, or verification of, compliance with the requirements of this section.

(e) If the State Department of Health Services determines that the federal Food and Drug Administration has not authorized written information intended for the layperson on collagen injections used in cosmetic, plastic, reconstructive, or similar surgery, the state department shall develop a standardized written summary to inform the patient of the risks and possible side effects of collagen injections as used in cosmetic, plastic, reconstructive, or similar surgery. In developing this summary, the state department shall do all of the following:

(1) Use only language that is simple and readily understood by a layperson.

(2) Include a disclaimer that the state in no
 way endorses any procedure, nor does the state claim to provide an exhaustive analysis of all the potential benefits or risks associated with any procedure.

(3) Identify the type of animal used to produce the collagen and identify the situations where the federal Food and Drug Administration has given its approval for the procedure.

(4) Provide only information approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(f) The State Department of Health Services shall update the written summary described in subdivision (e) as determined necessary by the state department to protect the public health and safety.

(g) The Medical Board of California shall publish the standardized written summary prepared pursuant to subdivision (e) and shall distribute copies of